Utah statutes.
57-2-12.   Certificate of proof by subscribing witness.

No certificate of such proof shall be made unless such subscribing witness shall prove that the person whose name is subscribed thereto as a party is the person described in, and who executed, the same; that such person executed the conveyance, and that such person subscribed his name thereto as a witness thereof at the request of the maker of such instrument.

